Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.570

Employment—Certificates of parental improvement.

Nursing homes, as defined in this chapter, may not automatically deny a prospective volunteer or employee solely because of a founded finding of child abuse or neglect involving the individual revealed in the record check or a court finding or a court finding that the individual's child was dependent as a result of a finding that the individual abused or neglected their child pursuant to RCW 13.34.030(6)(b) when that founded finding or court finding is accompanied by a certificate of parental improvement as defined in chapter 74.13 RCW related to the same incident without conducting a review to determine the individual's character, suitability, and competency to volunteer with vulnerable adults.

[ 2020 c 270 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 270: See note following RCW 74.13.720.